Missouri, session 2026, HB3290.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 34.600, RSMo, is repealed, to read as follows:
[34.600. 1. This section shall be known as the "Anti-Discrimination
Against Israel Act".
2. A public entity shall not enter into a contract with a company to
acquire or dispose of services, supplies, information technology, or
construction unless the contract includes a written certification that the
company is not currently engaged in and shall not, for the duration of the
contract, engage in a boycott of goods or services from the State of Israel;
companies doing business in or with Israel or authorized by, licensed by, or
organized under the laws of the State of Israel; or persons or entities doing
business in the State of Israel. This section shall not apply to contracts with a
total potential value of less than one hundred thousand dollars or to contractors
with fewer than ten employees.
3. As used in this section, the following terms and phrases shall mean:
(1) "Boycott Israel" and "boycott of the State of Israel", engaging in
refusals to deal, terminating business activities, or other actions to discriminate
against, inflict economic harm, or otherwise limit commercial relations
specifically with the State of Israel; companies doing business in or with Israel
or authorized by, licensed by, or organized under the laws of the State of Israel;
or persons or entities doing business in the State of Israel, that are all intended
to support a boycott of the State of Israel. A company's statement that it is
participating in boycotts of the State of Israel; companies doing business in or
with Israel or authorized by, licensed by, or organized under the laws of the
State of Israel; or persons or entities doing business in the State of Israel, or
that it has taken the boycott action at the request, in compliance with, or in
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 3290 2
furtherance of calls for a boycott of the State of Israel; companies doing
business in or with Israel or authorized by, licensed by, or organized under the
laws of the State of Israel; or persons or entities doing business in the State of
Israel shall be considered to be conclusive evidence that a company is
participating in a boycott of the State of Israel; companies doing business in or
with Israel or authorized by, licensed by, or organized under the laws of the
State of Israel; or persons or entities doing business in the State of Israel;
provided, however that a company that has made no such statement may still
be considered to be participating in a boycott of the State of Israel; companies
doing business in or with Israel or authorized by, licensed by, or organized
under the laws of the State of Israel; or persons or entities doing business in the
State of Israel if other factors warrant such a conclusion;
(2) "Company", any for-profit or not-for-profit organization,
association, corporation, partnership, joint venture, limited partnership,
limited liability partnership, limited liability company, or other entity or
business association, including all wholly owned subsidiaries, majority-owned
subsidiaries, parent companies, or affiliates of those entities or business
associations;
(3) "Public entity", the state of Missouri or any political subdivision
thereof, including all boards, commissions, agencies, institutions, authorities,
and bodies politic and corporate of the state created by or in accordance with
state law or regulations.
4. Any contract that fails to comply with the provisions of this section
shall be void against public policy.
5. The commissioner of administration or his or her designee may
promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this section so long as
they are consistent with this section and do not create any exceptions. Any
rule or portion of a rule, as that term is defined in section 536.010, that is
created under the authority of this section shall become effective only if it
complies with and is subject to all of the provisions of chapter 536 and, if
applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter 536 are nonseverable
and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly pursuant to chapter
536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul a rule are
subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority and
any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2020, shall be invalid and void.]
✔